North Dakota, session 69, HB1378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 47-10.2-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
47-10.2-01. Definitions.
In sections 47-10.2-01 through 47-10.2-03, unless the context or subject matter otherwise
requires:
1. "Borrower" means the obligor under a residential mortgage held by a mortgagee.
2. "Escrow account" means an account held by a lender or servicer used to collect and
hold funds for the payment of property taxes, homeowner's insurance, and other
related expenses associated with a residential mortgage.
3. "Escrow funds" means money placed into an escrow account by a borrower for the
payment of obligations such as property taxes, homeowner's insurance, and other
expenses associated with home ownership.
4. "Interest rate" means the percentage rate paid by the lender on funds held in escrow
accounts.
5. "Lender" means a bank, mortgage company, credit union, or other financial institution
that services residential mortgage loans and holds escrow accounts. The term does
not include the North Dakota housing finance agency.
Page No. 1 25.1015.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
6. "Servicer" means a person or entity maintaining an escrow account for a residential
mortgagee.
3.7. "Surplus amount" means from the annual escrow account analysis, any amount
greater than or equal to fifty dollars, excluding any escrow cushion required by the
servicer.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 47-10.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Lender's obligation to pay interest on escrow accounts.
A lender shall pay interest on funds held in an escrow account that maintains a minimum
average balance of five hundred dollars. The escrow account must have been in existence for a
minimum of three months before the interest may be credited. Only active accounts are eligible
for accumulation of interest.
SECTION 3. A new section to chapter 47-10.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Determining the acceptable interest rate.
1. The interest rate paid on escrow funds must be based on prevailing market rates for a
saving or similar deposit account. At minimum, all interest paid under this chapter must
be set at one - half percent annually. If the lender adjusts the interest rate, the change
must be consistent with changes in market rates for comparable deposit products. A
rate change may not disproportionately favor the lender.
2. A lender holding an escrow account shall use a transparent and clear formula for
determining the escrow account interest rate and clearly disclose the interest rate
applied to escrow accounts in a loan agreement. If a lender offers multiple types of
deposit accounts with different interest rates, the borrower must be informed of the
type of deposit product tied to the borrower's escrow account.
SECTION 4. A new section to chapter 47-10.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Disclosure - Opt - out .
1. A lender shall state in the mortgage agreement and in periodic statements how escrow
funds are managed, including details on the interest rate and how interest is credited.
Page No. 2 25.1015.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. A borrower may op t - out of the interest payment provision only if the borrower's
mortgage agreement explicitly allows the borrower to op t - out and the borrower agrees
to forfeit the interest in exchange for a reduced mortgage rate or other benefit.
SECTION 5. APPLICATION. This Act applies to an escrow account created after the
effective date of this Act. For an existing escrow account, interest payments required by this Act
must begin on January 1, 2026.
Page No. 3 25.1015.03000